Washington statutes.
RCW 18.250.020

Secretary's authority—Application of uniform disciplinary act.

(1) In addition to any other authority provided by law, the secretary may:

(a) Adopt rules, in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, necessary to implement this chapter;

(b) Establish all license, examination, and renewal fees in accordance with RCW 43.70.250;

(c) Establish forms and procedures necessary to administer this chapter;

(d) Establish administrative procedures, administrative requirements, and fees in accordance with RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280. All fees collected under this section must be credited to the health professions account as required under RCW 43.70.320;

(e) Develop and administer, or approve, or both, examinations to applicants for a license under this chapter;

(f) Establish continuing education requirements by rule;

(g) Issue a license to any applicant who has met the education, training, and examination requirements for licensure and deny a license to applicants who do not meet the minimum qualifications for licensure. However, denial of licenses based on unprofessional conduct or impaired practice is governed by the uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW;

(h) In consultation with the committee, approve examinations prepared or administered by private testing agencies or organizations for use by an applicant in meeting the licensing requirements under RCW 18.250.060;

(i) Determine which states have credentialing requirements substantially equivalent to those of this state, and issue licenses to individuals credentialed in those states that have successfully fulfilled the requirements of RCW 18.250.080;

(j) Hire clerical, administrative, and investigative staff as needed to implement and administer this chapter;

(k) Maintain the official department record of all applicants and licensees; and

(l) Establish requirements and procedures for an inactive license.

(2) The uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW, governs unlicensed practice, the issuance and denial of licenses, and the discipline of licensees under this chapter.

[ 2014 c 194 s 2; 2007 c 253 s 3.]